Hawaii statutes.
§482-28 Cancellation. The director
shall cancel the registration of a mark if the director receives a request for
cancellation from the registrant or assignee of record or when a court of
competent jurisdiction orders cancellation of a registration. [L 2001, c 15, pt
of §1; am L 2003, c 124, §97]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next